District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-772

Private facilities — Enforcement of provisions and regulations; inspection.

Repealed.

Apr. 20, 1908, 35 Stat. 64, ch. 148, § 2
Aug. 1, 1950, 64 Stat. 393, ch. 513, § 1
Feb. 24, 1984, D.C. Law 5-48, § 12(i), 30 DCR 5778

History

1981 Ed., § 32-102.
1973 Ed., § 32-302.

Prior Codifications